src/propernoun-smj-lex.txt
LEXICON BERN-obj
! Different lexicon for objects, concrete and abstract. Word. 
 +N+Prop+Obj: BERNDECL ;

LEXICON BERN
 +N+Prop: BERNDECL ;
 
LEXICON BERNDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ BERNUCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@:@U.Cap.Opt@a LASJ ; !SUB

LEXICON BERNUCASE ! Final foot structure (X) => Loc:as
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: R ;        
 +Sg+Ill:aj K ;
 +Ess:an K ;
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Gen:a R ;       
 +Sg+Acc:av K ;
 +Sg+Ine:an K ;
 +Sg+Ela:as K ;
 +Pl+Nom:a K ;
 +Pl+Gen:aj K ;
 +Pl+Gen:aj R ;      
 +Pl+Acc:ajt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ajda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ajn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ajs K ;
 +Pl+Com:aj K ;
 +Sg+Com:ajn K ;




LEXICON LONDON-atr		!SUB
 +N+Prop+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; !SUB

LEXICON LONDON-sur ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
! Different lexicon for personal surnames. 
 +N+Prop+Sur: LONDONDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  !SUB ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 
LEXICON LONDON-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani: LONDONDECL ; 

LEXICON LONDON-org
 +N+Prop+Org: LONDONDECL ; 

LEXICON LONDON-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal: LONDONDECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  !SUB ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDON-malsur
 +N+Prop+Mal: LONDONDECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Sur: LONDONDECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  !SUB ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDON-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem: LONDONDECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  !SUB ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDON-malfem
 +N+Prop+Fem: LONDONDECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Mal: LONDONDECL ; 

LEXICON LONDON-malplc
 +N+Prop+Plc: LONDONDECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Mal: LONDONDECL ; 

LEXICON LONDON-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc: LONDONDECL ; 

LEXICON LONDON-surplc
 +N+Prop+Plc: LONDONDECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Sur: LONDONDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  !SUB ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDON-orgsur
 +N+Prop+Org: LONDONDECL ; 
 +N+Prop+Sur: LONDONDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;  !SUB ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON LONDON-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj: LONDONDECL ; 

LEXICON LONDON
 +N+Prop: LONDONDECL ;

LEXICON LONDONDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ LONDONUCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ ; !SUB
 
LEXICON LONDONUCASE ! Final foot structure (X.) and (X..) => Loc:is
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom: R ;        
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;
 +Sg+Gen:a R ;              
 +Sg+Acc:av K ;
 +Sg+Ill:ij K ;  
 +Sg+Ine:in K ;
 +Sg+Ela:is K ;
 +Sg+Com:ijn K ;
 +Ess:in K ;
 +Pl+Nom:a K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ij K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ij R ;             
 +Pl+Acc:ijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ijn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:ij K ;


!LEXICON NIILLAS-obj
! +N+Prop+Obj: NIILLASDECL ; 
 
LEXICON NIILLAS-org
 +N+Prop+Org: NIILLASDECL ; 
 
LEXICON NIILLAS-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:  NIILLASDECL ; 
 
LEXICON NIILLAS-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:  NIILLASDECL ; 
 
LEXICON NIILLAS-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur: NIILLASDECL ;
 
LEXICON NIILLAS-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani: NIILLASDECL ;
 
LEXICON NIILLAS-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:  NIILLASDECL ;

!LEXICON NIILLAS ! No longer in use, all members are tagged.
! +N+Prop: NIILLASDECL ;

LEXICON NIILLASDECL ! Trisyll. Non-Gradating C-Proper Names
 @U.Cap.Obl@ NIILLAS-OBL ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ ; !SUB

LEXICON NIILLAS-OBL
# ;


LEXICON ANAR-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani: ANARDECL ; 

LEXICON ANAR-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj: ANARDECL ; 
 
LEXICON ANAR-org
 +N+Prop+Org: ANARDECL ; 
 
LEXICON ANAR-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal: ANARDECL ; 
 
LEXICON ANAR-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:  ANARDECL ; 
 
LEXICON ANAR-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur: ANARDECL ;
 
LEXICON ANAR-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:  ANARDECL ;

LEXICON ANAR
 +N+Prop: ANARDECL ;
 
LEXICON ANARDECL ! Cns-fin, no cons.grad.
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ANAR-OBL ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ ; !SUB

LEXICON ANAR-OBL
# ;
 
LEXICON GUOLBBA-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ GUOLBBA ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ ; !SUB
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom:X3@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;
 
LEXICON GUOLBBA
 +Sg+Nom:X3 K ;
 +Ess:X3n K ;
 +Sg+Nom:X3 R ;        
 +Sg+Gen:X5a K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X5a R ;              
 +Sg+Acc:X5av K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X5ij K ;  
 +Sg+Ine:X5in K ;
 +Sg+Ela:X5is K ;
 +Sg+Com:X5ijn K ;
 +Ess:X5in K ;
 +Pl+Nom:X5a K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5ij K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5ij R ;             
 +Pl+Acc:X5ijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X5ijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:X5ijn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:X5ijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:X5ij K ;


LEXICON PLACE-DIM-sur
# ;
LEXICON PLACE-DIM-plc
# ;

!LEXICON ROMSA-plc
! +N+Prop+Plc: ROMSADECL ;
! +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:Q1@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;

!LEXICON ROMSADECL !Inanim. Contracted -Names - from SUOLU
! @U.Cap.Obl@ ROMSA-OBL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ ; !SUB
! @U.Cap.Opt@ ROMSA-DC ;

!LEXICON ROMSA-DC
!# ;
!LEXICON ROMSA-OBL 
!# ;

LEXICON RANES-plc !Ráneš:Rátnehii
 +N+Prop+Plc@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ RANES-OBL ;
 
LEXICON RANES-OBL
 +Sg+Nom:Q1š K ; !XXX Q1 does not work because when there is -tn-
 +SgNomCmp:Q1š R ; !XXX Q1 does not work because when there is -tn-
 +Ess:Q1šin K ; !XXX Q1 does not work because when there is -tn-
 +Sg+Gen:ha K ;
 +Sg+Gen:ha R ; 
 +Sg+Acc:hav K ;
 +Sg+Ill:hij K ;
 +Sg+Ela:his K ;
 +Sg+Ine:hin K ;
 +Sg+Com:hijn K ;
 +Pl+Nom:ha K ;
 +Pl+Gen:hij K ;
 +Pl+Acc:hijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:hijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:hijn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:hijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:hij K ;

LEXICON CAVKKUS-plc !Čavkkus:Čavkohii
 +N+Prop+Plc@U.Cap.Obl@:@U.Cap.Obl@ CAVKKUS-OBL ;
 
LEXICON CAVKKUS-OBL
 +Sg+Nom:us K ;
 +SgNomCmp:us R ; 
 +Ess:usin K ;
 +Sg+Gen:oha K ;
 +Sg+Gen:oha R ; 
 +Sg+Acc:ohav K ;
 +Sg+Ill:ohij K ;
 +Sg+Ine:ohis K ;
 +Sg+Ela:ohin K ;
 +Sg+Com:ohijn K ;
 +Pl+Nom:oha K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ohij K ;
 +Pl+Acc:ohijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ohijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:ohijn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:ohijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:ohij K ;




LEXICON DAVVISUOLU-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc: DAVVISUOLUDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen@U.Cap.Opt@:@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;
 
LEXICON DAVVISUOLUDECL !Inanim. Contracted -Names - from DAVVISUOLU
 @U.Cap.Obl@ DAVVISUOLU-OBL ;

LEXICON DAVVISUOLU-OBL 
 +Sg+Nom:Q3j K ;
 +Ess:Q3n K ;
 +SgNomCmp:Q3j R ;        
 +Sg+Ill:X4j K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4v K ;
 +Sg+Ine:X4n K ;
 +Sg+Ela:X4s K ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4 K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X4j K ;
 +Pl+Acc:X4jt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X4jda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:X4jn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:X4js K ;
 +Pl+Com:X4j K ;
 +Sg+Com:X4X5jn K ; ! X5 for o:u in ComSg. Note two dummies in a row!
 +Ess:n K ;
 
!LEXICON DUORTNUS-fem
! +N+Prop+Fem: DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal: DUORTNUSDECL ;

!LEXICON DUORTNUS-sur
! +N+Prop+Plc: DUORTNUSDECL ;

!LEXICON DUORTNUS-obj
! +N+Prop+Obj: DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-org
 +N+Prop+Org: DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUS-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc: DUORTNUSDECL ;

!LEXICON DUORTNUS
! +N+Prop: DUORTNUSDECL ;

LEXICON DUORTNUSDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ DUORTNUSUCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@ LASJ ; !SUB

LEXICON DUORTNUSUCASE ! Cns-final, cons.grad.
 :Q1 NE-ODDCASE ; ! Q1 is general WeG
 +Sg+Nom: R ;                 
 +Sg+Gen:X5a K ;
 +Sg+Gen:X5a R ;              
 +Sg+Acc:X5av K ;
 +Sg+Ill:X5ij K ;  
 +Sg+Ine:X5in K ;
 +Sg+Ela:X5is K ;
 +Sg+Com:X5ijn K ;
 +Ess:X5in K ;
 +Pl+Nom:X5a K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5ij K ;
 +Pl+Gen:X5ij R ;             
 +Pl+Acc:X5ijt K ;
 +Pl+Ill:X5ijda K ;
 +Pl+Ine:X5ijn K ;
 +Pl+Ela:X5ijs K ;
 +Pl+Com:X5ij K ;


LEXICON EATNAMAT-org
HEANDARAT-org ; !XXX fix

!LEXICON HEANDARAT-ani
! +N+Prop+Ani: HEANDARATDECL ;

LEXICON HEANDARAT-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj: HEANDARATDECL ; 
 
LEXICON HEANDARAT-org
 +N+Prop+Org: HEANDARATDECL ; 
 
LEXICON HEANDARAT-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:  HEANDARATDECL ; 
 
LEXICON HEANDARAT-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:  HEANDARATDECL ; 
 
!LEXICON HEANDARAT-sur
! +N+Prop+Sur: HEANDARATDECL ;
 
LEXICON HEANDARAT-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:  HEANDARATDECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:aQ1@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAK ;



!LEXICON HEANDARAT ! No longer in use, all members are tagged.
! +N+Prop: HEANDARATDECL ;
 
LEXICON HEANDARATDECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@ HEANDARATUCASE ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@ LASJ ; !SUB

LEXICON ProperNoun
Magdalas:Magdalass HEANDARAT-fem ;
Magdalas:Magdalass HEANDARAT-fem ;
Almar LONDON-malsur ;
Audun:Audun9 LONDON-mal ;
Birehaš:Birehažž HEANDARAT-fem ;
Birgget:Birg'eh NIILLAS-fem ;
Birgget:Birggeh ANAR-fem ;
Bárttet:Bártteh ANAR ; ! Final t:h gradation
Bárttán:Bárttán9 DUORTNUS-mal ;
Carol LONDON-fem ;
Dag^blad:Dag^blad9 BERN-obj ;
Dali^an:Dali^an9 LONDON-org ;
Davvi-Várjjat:Davvi-Várjjag ANAR-plc ;
Doncaster LONDON-plc ;
Dre^yer LONDON-sur ;
Duo0más:Duopmás DUORTNUS-mal ;
Duopmas^suolu:Duopmas^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Duortnus:Duordnus DUORTNUS-plc ;
Ellsworth^ea0na:Ellsworth^eatnam8 GUOLBBA-plc ;
Em0moš:Em'mož NIILLAS-fem ;
Erik LONDON-mal ;
Europe^isk:Europe^isk9 LONDON-atr ;		!SUB
Falastat:Falastah'k HEANDARAT-org  ;
Fenris^ulven:Fenris^ulven9 LONDON-ani ;
Fiskeri^konsulenten:Fiskeri^konsulenten9 LONDON-obj ;
Freenet BERN-obj ;
Fávrán:Fávrán9 LONDON-ani ;
Giron NIILLAS-plc ;
Goahte^gearret:Goahte^gearreg NIILLAS-org ;
Graham^ea0na:Graham^eatnam8 GUOLBBA-plc ;
Grænse^komiteen:Grænse^komiteen9 LONDON-org ;
Guhtor ANAR-sur ;
Guhttor ANAR-sur ;
Guitanas:Guitanass HEANDARAT-plc ;
Guovža^suohpáš:Guovža^suohpáž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Gurut^bellodat:Gurut^bellodah'k HEANDARAT-org ;
Gáhpe^suolu:Gáhpe^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Gájáš:Gájáž PLACE-DIM-sur ;
Gárdin ANAR-obj ;
Gárgat^luoppal:Gárgat^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Hagar LONDON-fem ;
Hellem:Hellem9 LONDON-sur ;
Helmer LONDON-malsur ;
Helsset:Helsseg NIILLAS-plc ;
IJssel LONDON-plc ;
Ikon:Ikon9 LONDON-ani ;
Inkeroinen:Inkeroinen LONDON-surplc ;
Irján NIILLAS-mal ;
Issat:Issag ANAR-mal ;
Iđut:Iđuh ANAR-obj ;
Iŋger NIILLAS-fem ;
Jergol LONDON-malplc ;
Jievdeš:Jievdež NIILLAS-org ;
Jovkkoš:Jovkkož NIILLAS-plc ;
Jovsset:Jovsseb NIILLAS-mal ; ! XXX ?
Jussenaš:Jussenažž HEANDARAT-mal ; ! MARJA ;ke a name version
Justiisa^ministtar:Justiisa^minis'tar DUORTNUS-mal ;
Katekismus:Katekismus LONDON-obj ;
Kennet LONDON-mal ;
Keskinen:Keskinen LONDON-surplc ;
Kjerstin:Kjerstin9 LONDON-fem ;
Kultur^historisk:Kultur^historisk9 LONDON-atr ;	!SUB
Lemet:Lemeh  NIILLAS-mal ;
Likkat:Likka ANAR-plc ; !SUB !Something is wrong here
Luhkkar ANAR-sur ;
Luotonen:Luotonen LONDON-sur ;
Lábbájot BERN ; !SUB
Lárin:Lárin9 ANAR-mal ;
Lávrrohaš:Lávrrohažž HEANDARAT-mal ;
Mearrit:Mearrid ANAR-org ;
Messina^stredet LONDON-plc ;
Mihkkelaš:Mihkkelažž HEANDARAT-mal ;
Mokke^jár^luobbalaš:Mokke^jár^luobbalažž HEANDARAT-plc ;
Muosáid^suolu:Muosáid^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Máijan:Máijan9 BERN ; ! is this correct, or Essive?
Márget:Márgeh ANAR-fem ;
Neptun:Neptun9 LONDON-obj ;
Net^Show BERN-obj ;
Njárgon:Njárgon9 ANAR-ani ;
Nordisk:Nordisk9 LONDON-atr ;	!SUB
Norun:Norun9 LONDON-fem ;
Nuortaš:Nuortaž PLACE-DIM-plc ; !SUB
Nussir ANAR-org ;
Nállo^goat^duottar:Nállo^goat^duoddar DUORTNUS-plc ; !SUB
Oarjelet:Oarjelet BERN ; !SUB
Ofelaš:Ofelažž HEANDARAT-obj ;
Oikarainen:Oikarainen LONDON-surplc ;
Olgeš#bellodat:Olgeš#bellodah'k HEANDARAT-org ;
Ovlláš:Ovlláž NIILLAS-mal ;
Palmer^ea0na:Palmer^eatnam8 GUOLBBA-plc ;
Piiroinen:Piiroinen LONDON-surplc ;
Poastal ANAR-obj ;
Produkter LONDON-org ;
Rieser LONDON-orgsur ;
Rivojen:Rivojen9 LONDON-mal ;
Robin:Robin9 LONDON-malfem ;
Ruokto^suodjalus:Ruokto^suodjaluss HEANDARAT-org ;
Ráissot:Ráissoh NIILLAS-ani ;
Ráneš:Rátne RANES-plc ;
Rávdol ANAR-plc ;
S-Muzet:S-Muzeh ANAR-ani ;
S-Ruškut:S-Ruškuh ANAR-ani ;
Samisk:Samisk9 LONDON-atr ;	!SUB
Sarak:Sarag ANAR-fem ;
Sarak:Sarah ANAR-fem ;
Sejersen:Sejersen9 LONDON-sur ;
Shillong:Shillong9 LONDON-plc ;
Silbon:Silbon9 LONDON-ani ;
Siskin0d:Siskin'd9 BERN ; !The Gen form is Siskindda. How to make it?
Skaidi^pro^sjektet LONDON-obj ;
Skiellet:Skielleh NIILLAS-plc ;
Skolt:Skolt BERN-obj ;
Skuvla^friddja^ortnet:Skuvla^friddja^ortneg NIILLAS-org ;
Stuora^jár^suolu:Stuora^jár^suollu DAVVISUOLU-plc ;
Ságat:Ságah ANAR-org ;
Sápmelaš:Sápmelažž HEANDARAT-obj ;
Uhca-Gádj^oaivváš:Uhca-Gádj^oaivváž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Victori^a^ea0na:Victori^a^eatnam8 GUOLBBA-plc ;
Ville-Ásllat:Ville-Ásllah ANAR-mal ;
Vuojaš:Vuojaž NIILLAS-sur ;
Vuolit^luoppal:Vuolit^luobbal DUORTNUS-plc ;
Vuorká-Dávvir ANAR-org ;
Vuorká-Dávvirat:Vuorká-Dávvi7r EATNAMAT-org ;
Vál^joht`% Bi0ras:Vál^joht`% Birras DUORTNUS-org ;
Väkkäraš:Väkkäražž HEANDARAT-mal ;
Ádjihaš:Ádjihažž HEANDARAT-plc ;
Álet:Áleh NIILLAS-fem ;
Ánddar:Án'dar DUORTNUS-mal ;
Árran ANAR-obj ;
Áslat:Áslah ANAR-mal ;
Čiŋkaš:Čiŋkaž PLACE-DIM-plc ;
Čorgas ANAR-plc ;
Čávkus:Čávk CAVKKUS-plc ;
Kunstsamlinger LONDON-org ; !SUB
